Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1109
Director; adopt rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out and enforce the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 9.